Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Legislative Ethics Education

6.701.
Program of ethics education and training for legislators and legislative employees — Program of ethics education and training for legislative agents.

The commission shall establish and supervise a program of ethics education and training, including but not limited to:

Preparing and publishing an ethics education manual;

Designing and supervising orientation courses for new legislators; and

Designing and supervising current issues seminars for legislators and employees of the legislative branch of state government.

The commission shall establish, supervise, and conduct a program of ethics education and training designed specifically for and made available to legislative agents.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 33, effective September 16, 1993; 2020 ch. 127, § 3, effective July 15, 2020.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Since Chapter 4 of Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), contained an emergency clause [§ 92] it became effective as a whole when the Governor tendered the bill, which he had signed, to the Secretary of State on February 18, 1993. However, section 87 (13) of Ch. 4 of Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.) provided that, except as provided in §§ 88, 89, and 90, §§ 1-84 of the Act should become effective two hundred ten (210) days after the effective date of the Act, September 16, 1993; other subsections within § 87 establish a transition schedule with other specific dates calculated from the effective date of the Act. Such schedule is actually a listing of deadlines within which certain actions called for in § 87 of the Act are to be completed. Such schedule is as follows: “within 45 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before April 5, 1993; “within 60 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before April 19, 1993; “within 75 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before May 4, 1993; “within 90 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before May 19, 1993; “within 150 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before July 19, 1993; “within 180 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before August 17, 1993; “two hundred ten (210) days after the effective date of the act” = September 16, 1993.

OAG 93-25

.

6.706.
Ethics education manual for legislators.

The ethics education manual shall include, but not be limited to, ethics statutes, administrative regulations, explanations of purposes and principles underlying the laws, explanations of technical and specific legal requirements, examples of practical applications of the laws and principles, a questions-and-answers section regarding common problems and situations, summaries of advisory opinions, and any other information which would inform legislators about the required standards of conduct and assist them in applying those standards to specific situations.

The commission shall provide for the distribution of the manual to legislators. The commission shall distribute the first manual no later than one hundred twenty (120) days after appointment of the commission. On or before January 1, 1995, the commission shall distribute a supplement including, but not limited to, updates, additions, and revisions. Thereafter, the commission shall distribute revised and updated versions of the manual on or before January 1 of each odd-numbered year.

Copies of the manual shall be made available to the public for a reasonable fee, not to exceed the actual cost, but not including the cost of staff required.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 34, effective September 16, 1993.

6.711.
Orientation courses for legislators.

The commission shall design the general curriculum of orientation courses, which shall include but not be limited to explanations and discussions of the ethics laws, administrative regulations, relevant internal policies, specific technical and legal requirements, summaries of advisory opinions, underlying purposes and principles of ethics laws, examples of practical application of the laws and principles, and a question-and-answer participatory segment regarding common problems and situations. The commission shall prepare the methods and materials necessary to implement the curriculum.

The commission shall:

Administer the orientation courses for legislators;

Designate instructors to conduct their courses who shall be trained by the commission; and

Notify legislators regarding attendance in these courses.

The orientation courses shall be conducted for new legislators in December of each even-numbered year. Each course shall be at least two (2) hours in length and shall be designed for approval by the Kentucky Bar Association for continuing legal education credits which the bar association may require.

To facilitate participant interaction, those portions of the courses dedicated to group participation may be closed to the public.

Each legislator shall complete the initial orientation course offered under this section. Each legislator elected after the initial orientation course shall complete the next orientation course conducted. The commission may grant permission for a legislator to attend a later course for good cause shown.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 35, effective September 16, 1993; 2000, ch. 493, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2014, ch. 75, § 2, effective July 15, 2014; 2020 ch. 127, § 4, effective July 15, 2020.

6.716.
Current issues seminars for legislators and legislative employees.

The commission shall design the general curriculum of a current issues seminar, which shall include, but not be limited to, discussion of changes in the ethics laws and administrative regulations, new advisory opinions, current ethical issues confronting public servants, practical application of ethics laws and principles to specific issues and situations, and development of problem-solving skills. The commission shall prepare the methods and materials necessary to implement the curriculum.

The commission shall:

Administer the current issues seminars for legislators and training for employees of the legislative branch of state government;

Designate instructors to conduct their current issues courses who shall be trained by the commission; and

Notify legislators regarding attendance in these seminars.

The current issues seminars for legislators shall be conducted in January of each year. Each course shall be at least two (2) hours in length and shall be designed for approval by the Kentucky Bar Association for continuing legal education ethics credits which the bar association may require.

To facilitate participant interaction, those portions of the seminars dedicated to group participation may be closed to the public.

Each legislator, after completion of an orientation training course, shall complete one (1) current issues seminar annually.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 36, effective September 16, 1993; 2014, ch. 75, § 3, effective July 15, 2014; 2020 ch. 127, § 5, effective July 15, 2020.